Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-335
Civil action in lieu of hearing; election authorized.

When a charge is issued under section 20-333, a complainant, a respondent, or an aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed may elect to have the claims asserted in that charge decided in a civil action under section 20-340 in lieu of a hearing under section 20-336. The election must be made not later than twenty days after service has been made under section 20-333. The person making the election shall give notice of doing so to the commission and to all other complainants and respondents to whom the charge relates.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 36.